Mississippi statutes. Title 5. Legislative Department
Standing Joint Legislative Committee on Reapportionment

§ 5-3-91.
Standing joint legislative committee on reapportionment; membership; organization.

There is hereby created the standing joint legislative committee on reapportionment, to be composed of the chairman and vice chairman of the apportionment and elections committee of the house of representatives and the chairman and vice chairman of the elections committee of the senate; ten (10) members of the house of representatives, two (2) from each congressional district, to be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives; and ten (10) members of the senate, two (2) from each congressional district to be appointed by the lieutenant governor. In the event the congressional districts of the state shall change numerically, then the number appointed from the senate and appointed from the house by congressional districts shall be adjusted accordingly. The members shall serve until the end of the term of office for which such member has been elected.

The lieutenant governor and speaker of the house of representatives shall call an organizational meeting of the committee and the committee shall elect a chairman and such other officers as they deem necessary. A majority vote of the members of each house shall be required on all votes by the committee.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, 2d Ex Sess, ch. 23, § 1(1); Laws, 1981, ch. 304, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved February 2, 1981).

§ 5-3-93.
Committee to draw plan to apportion Mississippi Legislature.

The members of the committee shall draw a plan to apportion, according to constitutional standards, the membership of the Mississippi Senate and the Mississippi House of Representatives no later than fifteen (15) days prior to the scheduled adjournment of the next regular session of the Legislature following the delivery of the 2000 decennial census data to the state and every ten (10) years thereafter and at such other times as they may be directed by joint resolution of the Mississippi Legislature.

Provided, however, the committee shall not be required to present a plan to the Legislature prior to four (4) months after the publication of census data.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, 2d Ex Sess, ch. 23, § 1(2); Laws, 1981, ch. 304, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 504, § 1, eff from and after May 9, 2001 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section).

§ 5-3-95.
Per diem compensation; expenses and mileage.

The members of the committee shall be entitled to receive compensation as follows:

Per diem compensation for each day engaged in the discharge of official duties at the same rate as compensated during a special session of the Legislature and reimbursement for all actual, necessary expenses incurred in the discharge of official duties, including mileage as authorized by law; or

Per diem compensation for each day engaged in the discharge of official duties in the amount authorized by Section 25-3-69 and a mileage allowance and an expense allowance in the amount authorized by Section 5-1-47.

Prior to receiving any compensation pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, a member of the committee shall give notice in writing to the Secretary of the Senate or the Clerk of the House of Representatives, as the case may be, of the manner in which he desires to be compensated pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

No compensation shall be paid pursuant to this section for attending meetings of the committee while the Legislature is in session.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, 2d Ex Sess, ch 23, § 1(3); Laws, 1981, ch. 304, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 504, § 2, eff from and after May 9, 2001 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section).

§ 5-3-97.
State agencies and entities to cooperate with committee; employment of experts and other staff.

All political subdivisions, state agencies, and all other creatures of the state of Mississippi are hereby authorized and directed to assist the committee and to provide it with such professional, technical, and other expertise as each may possess when requested so to do. After an affirmative finding that professional, technical, or other expertise is needed that cannot be provided by the aforesaid political subdivisions, state agencies, and other creatures of the state, then the committee may employ or contract for such professional, technical, or other expertise necessary to accomplish the apportionment. The committee may employ staff personnel as it deems necessary.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, 2d Ex Sess, ch 23, § 1(4); Laws, 1981, ch. 304, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved February 2, 1981).

§ 5-3-99.
Procedure for determining norm to be represented by senators and representatives.

The committee shall divide the number of members of the senate that it recommends within constitutional limitations into the total population of the state as reported in each census to determine the number of persons which constitutes the norm to be represented by a senator.

The committee shall divide the number of members of the house of representatives that it recommends within constitutional limitations into the total population of the state as reported in each census to determine the number of persons which constitutes the norm to be represented by a representative.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, 2d Ex Sess, ch 23, § 2; Laws, 1981, ch. 304, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved February 2, 1981).

§ 5-3-101.
Guidelines and standards for apportionment.

In accomplishing the apportionment, the committee shall follow such constitutional standards as may apply at the time of the apportionment and shall observe the following guidelines unless such guidelines are inconsistent with constitutional standards at the time of the apportionment, in which event the constitutional standards shall control:

Every district shall be compact and composed of contiguous territory and the boundary shall cross governmental or political boundaries the least number of times possible; and

Districts shall be structured, as far as possible and within constitutional standards, along county lines; if county lines are fractured, then election district lines shall be followed as nearly as possible.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, 2d Ex Sess, § 3; Laws, 1981, ch. 304, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved February 2, 1981).

§ 5-3-103.
Submission of apportionment plans to legislature.

Upon completion of apportionment plans, the committee shall present its plans to the Mississippi Legislature, which shall act on the plans not later than the next regular session of the legislature. The committees to which the plans are referred shall report their recommendations to their respective houses no later than the forty-fifth day of the legislative session.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, 2d Ex Sess, ch. 23, § 4; Laws, 1981, ch. 304, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved February 2, 1981).